Tennessee, session 114, HB0465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-130(c), is amended by deleting
the language "within thirty (30) business days" and substituting "within sixty (60) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0465
001210
- 1 -